trunk/apertium-sv-da/dev/saldo.found.dix
<pardef n="oro__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ars</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rs</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rna</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arnas</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rnas</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cyk/el__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>els</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eln</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elns</l>      <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lar</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lers</l>      <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lars</l>      <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerna</l>     <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>larna</l>     <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lernas</l>    <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>larnas</l>    <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="m/an__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ans</l>       <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>annen</l>     <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>annens</l>    <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>än</l>        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>annar</l>     <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äns</l>       <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ans</l>       <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>annars</l>    <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ännen</l>     <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>annarna</l>   <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ännens</l>    <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>annarnas</l>  <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="temp/o__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ots</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ons</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ona</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onas</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="minim/um__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ums</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ums</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umets</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ums</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ana</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umen</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anas</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umens</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="cykel">           <i>cyk</i><par n="cyk/el__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="minimum">         <i>minim</i><par n="minim/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="man">             <i>m</i><par n="m/an__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tempo">           <i>temp</i><par n="temp/o__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="oro">             <i>oro</i><par n="oro__n_ut"/></e>
